Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.08
Coerce, defined.

Coerce means to compel a dealer
or manipulate a dealer to behave in an involuntary way, whether through action
or inaction, by use of threats, intimidation, trickery, or some other form
of pressure or force.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 20.